Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Mississippi Transportation Commission And National Parkways

§ 55-5-19.
Assent to acts of Congress; cooperation of state and federal agencies, etc.

The intent of this section is to assent to any act of the United States Congress authorizing the development of any national parkway located wholly or partly within the State of Mississippi, to the full extent that is necessary to secure any benefits under such act, provided that the hunting of migratory water fowl and other game and fishing shall not be prohibited or otherwise restricted by the United States government or any of its designated agencies in control of said project. It is the further intent of this section to authorize the appropriate state boards, commissions, and departments, and especially the state highway commission, and the governing bodies of counties, cities, towns and villages, to cooperate in the planning and development of all national parkways that may be proposed for development in Mississippi, with any agency or department of the government of the United States in which is vested the necessary authority to construct or otherwise develop such national parkways. Whenever authority shall exist for the planning and development of any national parkway, of which any portion shall be located in this state, it shall be the duty of the state highway commission to make such investigations and studies in cooperation with the appropriate federal agency, and such state boards, commissions and departments as shall have an interest in such parkway development, to the extent that shall be desirable and necessary in order to provide that the state shall secure all advantages that may accrue through such parkway development and that the interests of the counties, cities, villages and towns along the route shall be conserved.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5978; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.

§ 55-5-21.
Definitions.

For the purposes of Sections 55-5-19 through 55-5-33, all terms applying to any parkway, such as “secretary”, “parkway”, “scenic landscape”, “sightly or safety easement”, “access”, “parkway road”, “frontage”, and other or similar terms, which are defined in any act of the United States Congress applicable to such national parkway, shall have the meanings set forth in such act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5979; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.

§ 55-5-23.
Duty of Highway Commission to make investigations, surveys, studies and plans concerning national parkway.

The State Highway Commission shall have full authority to make such investigations, surveys, studies and plans in connection with any proposed national parkway or parkway development as it shall deem necessary or desirable in order to determine if the proposed development, under the terms of the act of the United States Congress applicable to such parkway or any regulation, under such act, are advantageous to the state. Such parkway development may be any portion of the proposed parkway, which it may be proposed to construct as a project under such act. The State Highway Commission may hold such hearings in connection with such investigations as it shall deem necessary or desirable, and shall give at least seven (7) days’ notice of such hearings by publication in at least two (2) newspapers having general circulation in the locality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5980; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.

§ 55-5-25.
Findings and determination of Highway Commission concerning parkway.

When the State Highway Commission has completed its investigations with respect to any proposed national parkway development, it shall make its findings and determination with respect to such proposed development. Such finding and determination shall state whether or not such proposed national parkway development is deemed advantageous to the state, shall include such information with respect to the development as shall be necessary to state its character and extent, and shall estimate the cost thereof and separately, the amount and character of lands necessary to be acquired in fee simple and in easements, with their cost, and needed to carry out the development.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5981; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.

§ 55-5-27.
Powers of Highway Commission to secure parkway development for state; utilization of county highway funds.

If the State Highway Commission, after such investigations and studies, shall find that the proposed parkway development is advantageous to the state, it shall have full authority to perform, on behalf of the state, each and every duty required of the state by the act of the United States Congress applicable to such parkway development, in order to secure the proposed development project for the state. For the purposes of such development project, the parkway shall be a portion of the state highway system. Any moneys that may be available for the improvement of the state highway system within any county may be available for any proposed national parkway development within such county, in the same manner as such moneys shall be available for state highways. The board of supervisors of any county may authorize the use of any moneys available to the county under any statutes, for the purposes of the proposed parkway development to the same amount as for state highways under such statutes. The board of supervisors may provide money for any national parkway development project in the same manner and in the same amount as for state highways, and any county bonds issued to provide funds for any such parkway development shall be retired in the same manner as bonds issued for state highways.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5982; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.

§ 55-5-29.
Acquisition of easements and rights-of-way by Highway Commission; conveyance of state and local government property to United States.

All lands for right of way to be acquired in the fee simple and all easements necessary to be acquired for the purposes of the proposed national parkway development may be acquired by the State Highway Commission in the name of the state, as may be required by the act of the United States Congress applicable thereto. Any lands owned by the state or by any county, city, village or town, may be conveyed to the United States for the purposes of the parkway in the manner provided by law. The commission may acquire such lands by gift, purchase agreement, or by exercising the right of eminent domain in any manner that may be provided by law for the acquirement of lands for public purposes. The commission shall have authority to convey such lands to the United States government or any of its agencies, as may be required by the act of the United States Congress applicable to such national parkway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5983; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.

§ 55-5-31.
Authorization of expenditures by Highway Commission.

The State Highway Commission shall not make any expenditures in furtherance of Sections 55-5-19 through 55-5-33 unless specifically authorized to do so by the legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.

§ 55-5-33.
Construction.

All powers granted in Sections 55-5-19 through 55-5-33 shall be liberally construed in favor of the State Highway Commission and any proposed national parkway development projects.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984; Laws, 1940, ch. 160.